Illinois, session 104th, SB3180.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Artificial Intelligence Data Privacy Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Artificial intelligence" has the meaning set forth in 8Section 2-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act.9    "Covered information" means any data:10        (1) created by or provided to a deployer by a user in 11    the course of using the deployer's artificial 12    intelligence; or13        (2) gathered by a deployer through the deployment of 14    an artificial intelligence to the user.15    "Deployer" means a person or entity who deploys artificial 16intelligence to a user.17    "Deploys artificial intelligence" means to integrate 18artificial intelligence into an environment in which the 19artificial intelligence is accessible to a user through a 20website, mobile application, dashboard, or other product or 21service.22    "User" means an individual who resides in this State and 23uses a deployed artificial intelligence.   SB3180- 2 -LRB104 19685 SPS 33134 b1    Section 10. Deployer requirements.2    (a) Beginning on January 1, 2027, a deployer shall comply 3with either of the following:4        (1) a deployer's artificial intelligence shall not 5    train on a user's covered information and retain the 6    training data indefinitely, unless the deployer first:7            (A) informs the user, in writing, that the 8        artificial intelligence will retain training data 9        indefinitely; and10            (B) obtains the user's express written consent to 11        allow the artificial intelligence to retain the 12        training data indefinitely; or13        (2) the default setting on the deployer's artificial 14    intelligence prohibits the artificial intelligence from 15    training on a user's covered information and is only 16    permitted to train on a user's covered information if the 17    user:18            (A) is notified that the artificial intelligence 19        will retain the training data indefinitely; and20            (B) affirmatively consents to change the default 21        setting.22    (b) A deployer may not disclose a user's covered 23information to a third party unless the deployer first obtains 24express written consent from the user for that disclosure.   SB3180- 3 -LRB104 19685 SPS 33134 b1    Section 15. Private right of action. A user who is 2aggrieved by a violation of this Act may bring a civil action 3against an offending party. A prevailing plaintiff may 4recover:5        (1) against a private entity that negligently violates 6    a provision of this Act, liquidated damages of $1,000 or 7    actual damages, whichever is greater;8        (2) against a private entity that intentionally or 9    recklessly violates a provision of this Act, liquidated 10    damages of $5,000 or actual damages, whichever is greater;11        (3) reasonable attorney's fees and costs, including 12    expert witness fees and other litigation expenses; and13        (4) other relief, including injunctive relief, as the 14    court may deem appropriate. 15    Section 20. Enforcement by the Attorney General. A 16violation of this Act constitutes an unlawful practice under 17the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. All 18remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the Attorney 19General by the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices 20Act shall be available to the Attorney General for the 21enforcement of this Act. 22    Section 90. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 23Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows:   SB3180- 4 -LRB104 19685 SPS 33134 b1    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)2    Sec. 2MMMM. Violations of the Artificial Intelligence Data 3Privacy Act. Any person who violates the Artificial 4Intelligence Data Privacy Act commits an unlawful practice 5within the meaning of this Act. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 71, 2027.